District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.95

Repealed

Board of Education.

Repealed.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 811, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 495
July 7, 2000, D.C. Law 13-159, § 2, 47 DCR 2212
June 1, 2007, 121 Stat. 223, Pub. L. 110-33, § 1(a)(2)
This section is referenced in § 1-207.19, § 1-315.02, § 38-175, § 38-1101, § 38-1121, § 38-1201.03, and § 38-2651.
1981 Ed., § 31-101(a).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 13-159 provided: “This act shall take effect following ratification by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia voting in a referendum held for such purpose and a 35-day period of Congressional review as provided in section 303 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-203.03), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.”

Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) expired on July 7, 2004.

In sections 901 to 903 of D.C. Law 17-9, the Council of the District of Columbia requested that Congress repeal this section.

Section 1 of Public Law 106-226 provided:

“Section 1. Waiver of congressional review period for school governance charter amendment act of 2000.

“Notwithstanding section 303 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act or any provision of the School Governance Charter Amendment Act of 2000, the School Governance Charter Amendment Act of 2000 shall take effect upon the date such Act is ratified by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia voting in a referendum held to ratify such Act.”